Washington statutes.
RCW 18.43.010

General provisions.

In order to safeguard life, health, and property, and to promote the public welfare, any person in either public or private capacity practicing or offering to practice engineering or land surveying, shall hereafter be required to submit evidence that he or she is qualified so to practice and shall be registered as hereinafter provided; and it shall be unlawful for any person to practice or to offer to practice in this state, engineering or land surveying, as defined in the provisions of this chapter, or to use in connection with his or her name or otherwise assume, use, or advertise any title or description tending to convey the impression that he or she is a professional engineer or a land surveyor, unless such a person has been duly registered under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 480; 1947 c 283 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8306-21. Prior: 1935 c 167 s 2; RRS s 8306-2.]

NOTES:

False advertising: Chapter 9.04 RCW.